Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7959.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 28-14-2.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 28-14 entitled "Payment
of Wages" is hereby amended to read as follows:
28-14-2.1. Statement of earnings.
(a) On every regular payday, every employer shall furnish to any employee the following:
(1) A statement of the hours worked by that employee during the applicable pay period;
provided, that the statement need not be furnished to an employee described in § 28-12-4.3;
(2) A record of all deductions made from that employee’s gross earnings during the pay
period together with an explanation of the basis or reason for the deductions; and
(3) For employers engaged only in the commercial construction industry, a record of the
employee’s hourly regular rate of pay. As used in this subsection, “commercial construction
industry” includes a business that engages in the doing of work or the furnishing of materials, or
both, in the building, erection, alteration, or preparation of an improvement on commercial real
property. An employer, at the time of each payment of wages, shall furnish to their employee, either
as a detachable part of the check, draft, or voucher paying the employee's wages, or separately if
wages are paid by personal check or cash, an accurate written itemized statement showing:
(1) Gross wages earned;
(2) Total hours worked by the employee;
(3) The number of piece-rate units earned and any applicable piece rate if the employee is
paid on a piece-rate basis;

(4) The amount and purpose of each itemized deduction in understandable language and
form;
(5) Net wages earned;
(6) The inclusive dates of the period for which the employee is paid;
(7) The name and address of the legal entity that is the employer; and
(8) All applicable hourly rates in effect during the pay period and the corresponding
number of hours worked, at each hourly rate by the employee. The deductions made from payment
of wages shall be recorded in ink or other indelible form, properly dated, showing the month, day,
and year, and a copy of the statement and the record of the deductions shall be kept on file, in
accordance with § 28-14-12. For purposes of this section, "copy" includes a duplicate of the
itemized statement provided to an employee or a computer-generated record that accurately shows
all of the information required by this section.
(b) All statements and records required to be furnished to an employee by this section may
be furnished as an electronic record. The employer shall furnish to an employee a printed or
handwritten record, in lieu of an electronic record, at no cost to the employee, when a written
authorization from such employee is provided to the employer.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005715
========
LC005715 - Page 2 of 3